California, session 20252026, AB2388.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 23957 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:23957. Applications for licenses for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for premises which are to be constructed or which are in the process of construction shall contain the information required by this article and such other information concerning the proposed premises as the department may require to assist it in determining whether the proposed premises will qualify for a license.